Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. This act may be referred to as the Washington state children and pets safety parity act.Sec. 2. RCW 16.52.085 and 2025 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Minimum care" means care sufficient to preserve the physical and mental health and well-being of an animal and includes, but is not limited to, the following requirements:(i) Food of sufficient nutrition, quantity, and quality to allow for normal growth or maintenance of healthy body weight;(ii) Open or adequate access to potable water of a drinkable temperature in sufficient quantity to satisfy the animal's needs;(iii) Shelter sufficient to protect the animal from wind, rain, snow, sun, or other environmental or weather conditions based on the animal's species, age, or physical condition;(iv) Veterinary or other care as may be deemed necessary by a reasonably prudent person to prevent or relieve in a timely manner distress from injury, neglect, or physical infirmity; and(v) Continuous access to an area:(A) With adequate space for exercise necessary for the physical and mental health and well-being of the animal. Inadequate space may be indicated by evidence of debility, stress, or abnormal behavior patterns;(B) With temperature and ventilation suitable for the health and well-being of the animal based on the animal's species, age, or physical condition;(C) With regular diurnal lighting cycles of either natural or artificial light; and(D) Kept reasonably clean and free from excess waste, garbage, noxious odors, or other contaminants, objects, or other animals that could cause harm to the animal's health and well-being.(b) "Physical infirmity" includes, but is not limited to, starvation, dehydration, hypothermia, hyperthermia, muscle atrophy, restriction of blood flow to a limb or organ, mange or other skin disease, or parasitic infestation.(c) "Physical injury" includes, but is not limited to, substantial physical pain, fractures, cuts, burns, punctures, bruises, or other wounds or illnesses produced by violence or by a thermal or chemical agent.(d) "Serious physical injury or infirmity" means physical injury or physical infirmity that creates a substantial risk of death or that causes protracted disfigurement, protracted impairment of health, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a limb or bodily organ.(2)(a) If a law enforcement officer or animal control officer has probable cause to believe that an owner of a domestic animal has violated this chapter or a person owns, cares for, or resides with an animal in violation of RCW 16.52.200 or a pretrial order by a court, the officer, after obtaining a warrant, may enter the premises where the animal is located and seize the animal.(b) If a law enforcement officer or an animal control officer has probable cause to believe an animal is in imminent danger or is suffering serious physical injury or infirmity, or needs immediate medical attention, the officer may enter onto private property without a warrant to:(i) Render emergency aid to the animal; or(ii) Seize the animal without a warrant. Any animal seized without a warrant shall immediately be brought to a veterinarian licensed in the state of Washington to provide medical attention and to assess the health of the animal.(c) An animal control officer shall notify law enforcement when there is probable cause to believe that a child is also present in the home and that similar circumstances affecting the animal may also affect a child. Law enforcement officers shall act, pursuant to RCW 26.44.050, when they receive a report from an animal control officer pursuant to this section or they have probable cause to believe that a child is also present in the home and that similar circumstances affecting the animal may also affect a child.(d) A law enforcement officer or an animal control officer is not liable for any damages for entry onto private property without a warrant under this section, provided that the officer does not use any more force than is reasonably necessary to enter upon the property and remove the animal.(3)(a) An animal seized under this section may be placed into the custody of an animal care and control agency, into foster care that is not associated in any way with the owner, or with a nonprofit humane society, nonprofit animal sanctuary, or nonprofit rescue organization. In determining what is a suitable placement, the officer shall consider the animal's needs, including its size, medical needs, and behavioral characteristics. Any person or custodial agency receiving an animal seized under this section shall provide the animal with minimum care.(b) If a seized animal is placed into foster care or with a nonprofit animal sanctuary or rescue organization, the seizing agency shall retain constructive custody of the animal, shall have the duty to ensure the animal receives minimum care, and may draw from the bond under subsection (5) of this section and distribute the funds to the foster home, authorized humane society, sanctuary, or rescue organization that is authorized to care for the animal.(4) The owner from whom the animal was seized shall be provided with notice of the right to petition for immediate return of the animal and shall be afforded an opportunity to petition for such a civil hearing before the animal is deemed abandoned and forfeited. Any owner whose animal is seized by a law enforcement officer or animal control officer under this section shall, within 72 hours following the seizure, be given written notice of the circumstances of the removal and notice of legal remedies available to the owner. The notice shall be given by posting at the place of seizure, by delivery to the last known or suspected owner in person or a person residing at the place of seizure, or by registered mail to the last known or suspected owner. Such notice shall include:(a) The name, business address, and telephone number of the law enforcement agency or animal care and control agency responsible for seizing the animal;(b) A description of the seized animal;(c) The authority and purpose for the seizure, including the time, place, and circumstances under which the animal was seized;(d) A statement that the owner is responsible for the cost of care for an animal who was lawfully seized, and that the owner will be required to post a bond with the clerk of the district court of the county from which the animal was seized to defray the cost of minimum care pursuant to subsection (5) of this section within 14 calendar days of the seizure or the animal will be deemed abandoned and forfeited; and(e) A statement that the owner has a right to petition the district court for a civil hearing for immediate return of the animal and that in order to receive a hearing, the owner or owner's agent must request the civil hearing by signing and returning to the court an enclosed petition within 14 calendar days after the date of seizure. The enclosed petition must be in substantially the same form as set forth in subsection (13) of this section.(5)(a) When an animal is seized pursuant to this section, the owner shall post a bond with the district court in an amount sufficient to provide minimum care for each animal seized for 30 days, including the day on which the animal was taken into custody, regardless of whether the animal is the subject of a criminal charge. Such bond shall be filed with the clerk of the district court of the county from which the animal was seized within 14 calendar days after the day the animal is seized.(b)(i) If an owner fails to post a bond by 5:00 p.m. on the 14th calendar day after the day the animal was seized as required under this section, the animal is deemed abandoned and the owner's interest in the animal is forfeited to the custodial agency by operation of law in accordance with the notice provided in subsection (4) of this section.(ii) A petition required by subsection (4)(e) of this section may be filed in the district court of the county from which an animal was seized concerning any animal seized pursuant to this section. Copies of the petition must be served on the law enforcement agency or animal care and control agency responsible for seizing the animal and the prosecuting attorney.(iii) An owner's failure to file a written petition by 5:00 p.m. on the 14th calendar day after the day the animal was seized shall constitute a waiver of the right to file a petition under this subsection and the animal is deemed abandoned and the owner's interest in the animal is forfeited to the custodial agency by operation of law unless a bond has been posted pursuant to this subsection (5). The court may extend the 14-day period to file a written petition by an additional 14 calendar days if the petitioner did not have actual notice of the seizure and the court finds, on the record and in writing, that there are exceptional and compelling circumstances justifying the extension.(c)(i) Upon receipt of a petition pursuant to (b) of this subsection, the court shall set a civil hearing on the petition. The hearing shall be conducted within 30 calendar days after the filing of the petition.(ii) At the hearing requested by the owner, the rules of civil procedure shall apply and the respondent shall have the burden of establishing probable cause to believe that the seized animal was subjected to a violation of this chapter. The owner shall have an opportunity to be heard before the court makes its final finding. If the court finds that probable cause exists, the court shall order the owner to post a bond as required by this subsection (5) within 72 hours of the hearing, and if the owner fails to do so, the seized animal is deemed abandoned and the owner's interest in the animal is forfeited to the custodial agency by operation of law. If the respondent does not meet its burden of proof, the court may order the animal returned to the owner at no cost to the owner, subject to conditions set by the court. If the court orders the return of an animal to the owner, the court may also order:(A) Reasonable attorney fees for the owner; and(B) A full refund of the bond posted pursuant to this subsection (5) by the owner for the care of the animal.(d)(i) If a bond has been posted in accordance with this subsection (5), subsequent court proceedings shall be given court calendar priority so long as the animal remains in the custody of the custodial agency and the custodial agency may draw from the bond the actual reasonable costs incurred by the agency in providing minimum care to the animal from the date of seizure to the date of final disposition of the animal in the criminal action.(ii) At the end of the time for which expenses are covered by the bond, if the owner seeks to prevent disposition of the animal by the custodial agency, the owner shall post a new bond with the court within 72 hours following the prior bond's expiration. If an owner fails to post or renew a bond as required under this subsection (5), the animal is deemed abandoned and the owner's interest in the animal is forfeited to the custodial agency by operation of law.(e) For the purposes of this subsection (5), "animal" includes all unborn offspring of the seized animal and all offspring of the seized animal born after the animal was seized.(6) When an animal is seized from a person prohibited from owning, caring for, possessing, or residing with animals under RCW 16.52.200 or an order issued pursuant to RCW 16.52.117, 16.52.205, or 16.52.207, the animal is immediately and permanently forfeited by operation of law to the custodial agency and no court action is necessary.(7) If an animal is forfeited to a custodial agency according to the provisions of this section, the agency to which the animal was forfeited may place the animal with a new owner; provided that the agency may not place the animal with family members or friends of the former owner or with anyone who lives in the same household as the former owner. At the time of placement, the agency must provide the new owner with notice that it may constitute a crime for the former owner to own, care for, possess, or reside with the animal at any time in the future.(8) A custodial agency may authorize a veterinarian or veterinary technician licensed in the state of Washington or a certified euthanasia technician certified in the state of Washington to euthanize a seized animal for humane reasons at any time if the animal is severely injured, sick, diseased, or suffering.(9) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the voluntary, permanent relinquishment of any animal by its owner to a law enforcement officer, animal control officer, or animal care and control agency. Voluntary relinquishment has no effect on the criminal charges that may be pursued by the appropriate authorities.(10) Nothing in this chapter requires court action for taking custody of, caring for, and properly disposing of stray, feral, at-large, or abandoned animals, or wild animals not owned or kept as pets or livestock, as lawfully performed by law enforcement agencies or animal care and control agencies.(11) Any authorized person caring for, treating, or attempting to restore an animal to health under this chapter shall not be civilly or criminally liable for such action.(12) The provisions of this section are in addition to, and not in lieu of, the provisions of RCW 16.52.200.(13) A petition for a civil hearing for the immediate return of a seized animal shall be in a form substantially similar to the following:"IN THE . . . . . COURTOF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FORTHE COUNTY OF . . . . . .. . . .,No. . . . .Petitioner,Â Â vs.Â PETITION FOR. . . .,RETURN OF SEIZEDRespondentÂ ANIMALSPARTIES/JURISDICTION(a)(i) That Petitioner is, and at all relevant times herein was, a resident of . . . . . (county of residence) County, Washington.(ii) That Respondent is, and at all relevant times herein was, an agent, contractor, or political subdivision of the City/County of . . . . . (city or county of seizing agency), State of Washington.(iii) That Petitioner's animal/animals were seized by Respondent in . . . . . (county where animals were seized) County, Washington.(iv) That this Court has jurisdiction over the subject matter and the parties hereto.FACTS(b)(i) That upon seizure of . . . . (number and type of animals) such animals were placed in the care and custody of the Respondent on . . . . (date of seizure).(ii) That on or about . . . . (date on notice) the Respondent issued a seizure, bond, and forfeiture notice under RCW 16.52.085, a true and correct copy of said notice and accompanying attachments is attached hereto and incorporated herein as Exhibit A (attach a copy of the notice of seizure to this petition).(iii) That pursuant to such notice, Petitioner herein files this petition for the immediate return of all such seized animals pursuant to RCW 16.52.085.PRAYER(c) Petitioner prays that this Court grant said petition and order the immediate return of Petitioner's aforementioned animals to Petitioner's care and custody.DATED the . . . day of ........, ....By: ...................................Petitioner (Signature)((["]))"Sec. 3. RCW 26.44.050 and 2024 c 328 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in RCW 26.44.030(12), upon the receipt of a report alleging that abuse or neglect has occurred, the law enforcement agency or the department must investigate and provide the protective services section with a report in accordance with chapter 74.13 RCW, and where necessary to refer such report to the court.(2) A law enforcement officer may take, or cause to be taken, a child into custody without a court order if there is probable cause to believe that taking the child into custody is necessary to prevent imminent physical harm to the child due to child abuse or neglect, including that which results from sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, a high-potency synthetic opioid, or a pattern of severe neglect, and the child would be seriously injured or could not be taken into custody if it were necessary to first obtain a court order pursuant to RCW 13.34.050. The law enforcement agency or the department investigating such a report is hereby authorized to photograph such a child for the purpose of providing documentary evidence of the physical condition of the child.(3) Law enforcement agencies are authorized to receive reports of child abuse or neglect under RCW 16.52.085. A law enforcement officer shall take a child into custody without a court order when a report is made under RCW 16.52.085.Sec. 4. RCW 13.34.060 and 2021 c 211 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A child taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050 shall be immediately placed in shelter care. A child taken by a relative of the child in violation of RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070 shall be placed in shelter care only when permitted under RCW 13.34.055. No child may be held longer than ((seventy-two))72 hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after such child is taken into custody unless a court order has been entered for continued shelter care or as otherwise provided in this section. In no case may a child who is taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.055, 13.34.050, or 26.44.050 be detained in a secure detention facility.(2) Unless there is reasonable cause based on specific evidence to believe that the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or that the efforts to reunite the parent and child will be hindered, priority placement for a child in shelter care, pending a court hearing, shall be with any person described in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) or 13.34.130(1)(b). The person must be willing and available to care for the child and be able to meet any special needs of the child and the court must complete the inquiry required under RCW 13.34.065 to establish whether continued placement with the relative is appropriate. The person must be willing to facilitate the child's visitation with siblings, if such visitation is part of the department's plan or is ordered by the court. If a child is not initially placed with a relative or other suitable person requested by the parent pursuant to this section, the department shall make continuing efforts to place the child with a relative or other suitable person requested by the parent on the next business day after the child is taken into custody. The department shall document its effort to place the child with a relative or other suitable person requested by the parent pursuant to this section. Nothing within this subsection (2) establishes an entitlement to services or a right to a particular placement.(3) Whenever a child is taken into custody pursuant to this section, the department may authorize evaluations of the child's physical or emotional condition, routine medical and dental examination and care, and all necessary emergency care, after informing the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, unless the parent, guardian, or legal custodian cannot be reached. The child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian must be provided the opportunity to attend any appointments authorized under this subsection, unless prohibited by court order.(4) A child taken into custody pursuant to RCW 16.52.085 and 26.44.050 shall not be returned home until a court has determined that the home is safe for both the child and animal and a joint safety plan for both the child and animal has been developed.Sec. 5. RCW 13.34.110 and 2020 c 312 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The court shall hold a fact-finding hearing on the petition and, unless the court dismisses the petition, shall make written findings of fact, stating the reasons therefor. The rules of evidence shall apply at the fact-finding hearing and the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child shall have all of the rights provided in RCW 13.34.090(1). The petitioner shall have the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030.(2)(a) The court in a fact-finding hearing may consider the history of past involvement of child protective services or law enforcement agencies with the family for the purpose of establishing a pattern of conduct, behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or welfare of the child on the part of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, or for the purpose of establishing that reasonable efforts have been made by the department to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been destroyed or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such purposes.(b) When a child and animal are removed under RCW 16.52.085 and 26.44.050 the court shall make findings on whether the home is safe for both the child and animal to be returned.(3)(a) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child may waive his or her right to a fact-finding hearing by stipulating or agreeing to the entry of an order of dependency establishing that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030. The parent, guardian, or legal custodian may also stipulate or agree to an order of disposition pursuant to RCW 13.34.130 at the same time. Any stipulated or agreed order of dependency or disposition must be signed by the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and his or her attorney, unless the parent, guardian, or legal custodian has waived his or her right to an attorney in open court, and by the petitioner and the attorney, guardian ad litem, or court-appointed special advocate for the child, if any. If the department is not the petitioner and is required by the order to supervise the placement of the child or provide services to any party, the department must also agree to and sign the order.(b) Entry of any stipulated or agreed order of dependency or disposition is subject to approval by the court. The court shall receive and review a social study before entering a stipulated or agreed order and shall consider whether the order is consistent with the allegations of the dependency petition and the problems that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care. No social file or social study may be considered by the court in connection with the fact-finding hearing or prior to factual determination, except as otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence.(c) Prior to the entry of any stipulated or agreed order of dependency, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the child and his or her attorney must appear before the court and the court within available resources must inquire and establish on the record that:(i) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian understands the terms of the order or orders he or she has signed, including his or her responsibility to participate in remedial services as provided in any disposition order;(ii) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian understands that entry of the order starts a process that could result in the filing of a petition to terminate his or her relationship with the child within the time frames required by state and federal law if he or she fails to comply with the terms of the dependency or disposition orders or fails to substantially remedy the problems that necessitated the child's placement in out-of-home care;(iii) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian understands that the entry of the stipulated or agreed order of dependency is an admission that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030 and shall have the same legal effect as a finding by the court that the child is dependent by at least a preponderance of the evidence, and that the parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall not have the right in any subsequent proceeding for termination of parental rights pursuant to this chapter or guardianship pursuant to ((chapters [chapter]))chapter 13.36 or 11.130 RCW to challenge or dispute the fact that the child was found to be dependent; and(iv) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian knowingly and willingly stipulated and agreed to and signed the order or orders, without duress, and without misrepresentation or fraud by any other party.If a parent, guardian, or legal custodian fails to appear before the court after stipulating or agreeing to entry of an order of dependency, the court may enter the order upon a finding that the parent, guardian, or legal custodian had actual notice of the right to appear before the court and chose not to do so. The court may require other parties to the order, including the attorney for the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, to appear and advise the court of the parent's, guardian's, or legal custodian's notice of the right to appear and understanding of the factors specified in this subsection. A parent, guardian, or legal custodian may choose to waive his or her presence at the in-court hearing for entry of the stipulated or agreed order of dependency by submitting to the court through counsel a completed stipulated or agreed dependency fact-finding/disposition statement in a form determined by the Washington state supreme court pursuant to General Rule GR 9.(4) Immediately after the entry of the findings of fact, the court shall hold a disposition hearing, unless there is good cause for continuing the matter for up to ((fourteen))14 days. If good cause is shown, the case may be continued for longer than ((fourteen))14 days. Notice of the time and place of the continued hearing may be given in open court. If notice in open court is not given to a party, that party shall be notified by certified mail of the time and place of any continued hearing. Unless there is reasonable cause to believe the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or efforts to reunite the parent and child would be hindered, the court shall direct the department to notify those adult persons who: (a) Are related by blood or marriage to the child in the following degrees: Parent, grandparent, brother, sister, stepparent, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, or aunt; (b) are known to the department as having been in contact with the family or child within the past ((twelve))12 months; and (c) would be an appropriate placement for the child. Reasonable cause to dispense with notification to a parent under this section must be proved by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.The parties need not appear at the fact-finding or dispositional hearing if the parties, their attorneys, the guardian ad litem, and court-appointed special advocates, if any, are all in agreement.Sec. 6. RCW 13.34.130 and 2024 c 328 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:If, after a fact-finding hearing pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, it has been proven by a preponderance of the evidence that the child is dependent within the meaning of RCW 13.34.030 after consideration of the social study prepared pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 and after a disposition hearing has been held pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, the court shall enter an order of disposition pursuant to this section.(1) The court shall order one of the following dispositions of the case:(a) Order a disposition that maintains the child in his or her home, which shall provide a program designed to alleviate the immediate danger to the child, to mitigate or cure any damage the child has already suffered, and to aid the parents so that the child will not be endangered in the future. In determining the disposition, the court should choose services to assist the parents in maintaining the child in the home, including housing assistance, if appropriate, that least interfere with family autonomy and are adequate to protect the child.(b)(i) Order the child to be removed from his or her home and into the custody, control, and care of a relative or other suitable person, the department, or agency responsible for supervision of the child's placement. If the court orders that the child be placed with a caregiver over the objections of the parent or the department, the court shall articulate, on the record, his or her reasons for ordering the placement. The court may not order an Indian child, as defined in RCW 13.38.040, to be removed from his or her home unless the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence including testimony of qualified expert witnesses, that the continued custody of the child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the child.(ii) The department has the authority to place the child, subject to review and approval by the court (A) with a relative as defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a), (B) in the home of another suitable person if the child or family has a preexisting relationship with that person, and the person has completed all required criminal history background checks and otherwise appears to the department to be suitable and competent to provide care for the child, or (C) in a foster family home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.(iii) The department may also consider placing the child, subject to review and approval by the court, with a person with whom the child's sibling or half-sibling is residing or a person who has adopted the sibling or half-sibling of the child being placed as long as the person has completed all required criminal history background checks and otherwise appears to the department to be competent to provide care for the child.(2) Absent good cause, the department shall follow the wishes of the natural parent regarding the placement of the child in accordance with RCW 13.34.260.(3) The department may only place a child with a person not related to the child as defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a), including a placement provided for in subsection (1)(b)(iii) of this section, when the court finds that such placement is in the best interest of the child. Unless there is reasonable cause to believe that the health, safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or that efforts to reunite the parent and child will be hindered, the child shall be placed with a person who is willing, appropriate, and available to care for the child, and who is: (I) Related to the child as defined in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) with whom the child has a relationship and is comfortable; or (II) a suitable person as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section. The court shall consider the child's existing relationships and attachments when determining placement.(4) If the child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in this chapter, the court shall, within ((sixty))60 days of placement, hold a hearing to:(a) Consider the assessment required under RCW 13.34.420 and submitted as part of the department's social study, and any related documentation;(b) Determine whether placement in foster care can meet the child's needs or if placement in another available placement setting best meets the child's needs in the least restrictive environment; and(c) Approve or disapprove the child's placement in the qualified residential treatment program.(5) When placing an Indian child in out-of-home care, the department shall follow the placement preference characteristics in RCW 13.38.180.(6) Placement of the child with a relative or other suitable person as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be given preference by the court. An order for out-of-home placement may be made only if the court finds that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home and to make it possible for the child to return home, specifying the services, including housing assistance, that have been provided to the child and the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and that prevention services have been offered or provided and have failed to prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety, and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home, and that:(a) There is no parent or guardian available to care for such child;(b) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian is not willing to take custody of the child; or(c) The court finds, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, a manifest danger exists that the child will suffer serious abuse or neglect if the child is not removed from the home and an order under RCW 26.44.063 would not protect the child from danger. The court shall give great weight to the lethality of high-potency synthetic opioids and public health guidance from the department of health related to high-potency synthetic opioids, including fentanyl, when deciding whether a manifest danger exists.(7) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court shall consider whether it is in a child's best interest to be placed with, have contact with, or have visits with siblings.(a) There shall be a presumption that such placement, contact, or visits are in the best interests of the child provided that:(i) The court has jurisdiction over all siblings subject to the order of placement, contact, or visitation pursuant to petitions filed under this chapter or the parents of a child for whom there is no jurisdiction are willing to agree; and(ii) There is no reasonable cause to believe that the health, safety, or welfare of any child subject to the order of placement, contact, or visitation would be jeopardized or that efforts to reunite the parent and child would be hindered by such placement, contact, or visitation. In no event shall parental visitation time be reduced in order to provide sibling visitation.(b) The court may also order placement, contact, or visitation of a child with a stepbrother or stepsister provided that in addition to the factors in (a) of this subsection, the child has a relationship and is comfortable with the stepsibling.(8) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section and placed into nonparental or nonrelative care, the court shall order a placement that allows the child to remain in the same school he or she attended prior to the initiation of the dependency proceeding when such a placement is practical and in the child's best interest.(9) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order that a petition seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be filed if the requirements of RCW 13.34.132 are met.(10) If there is insufficient information at the time of the disposition hearing upon which to base a determination regarding the suitability of a proposed placement with a relative or other suitable person, the child shall remain in foster care and the court shall direct the department to conduct necessary background investigations as provided in chapter 74.15 RCW and report the results of such investigation to the court within ((thirty))30 days. However, if such relative or other person appears otherwise suitable and competent to provide care and treatment, the criminal history background check need not be completed before placement, but as soon as possible after placement. Any placements with relatives or other suitable persons, pursuant to this section, shall be contingent upon cooperation by the relative or other suitable person with the agency case plan and compliance with court orders related to the care and supervision of the child including, but not limited to, court orders regarding parent-child contacts, sibling contacts, and any other conditions imposed by the court. Noncompliance with the case plan or court order shall be grounds for removal of the child from the relative's or other suitable person's home, subject to review by the court.(11) Any court that makes findings under RCW 13.34.110(2)(b) shall include a joint safety plan in any order of disposition it makes.--- END ---